Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 31. Office of Guardian Ad Litem

History.

2020 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 7, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 9-2-3101.
Office created; appointment of director.

The office of guardian ad litem is created as a separate operating agency as provided in W.S. 9-2-1704(d).

The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a director of the office who shall serve as the administrative head of the office and as chief guardian ad litem. Unless sooner removed, the director’s term of appointment expires at the end of the term of office of the governor during which he was appointed. The director serves at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall:

Be a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar;

Have experience in guardian ad litem representation, child welfare and juvenile justice;

Be compensated as determined by the Wyoming personnel division;

Devote full time to the performance of his duties;

Administer the guardian ad litem program as provided in W.S.

14-12-101

through

14-12-104

.

The director shall not engage in private practice except to complete business pending at the time of his appointment.

History.

2020 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 122, § 7, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.